Utah statutes.
19-6-812.   Landfilling shredded tires -- Reimbursement.
(1)  A waste tire may be disposed of in a landfill if:
(a)  the land fill is operated in compliance with the requirements of Title
19, Chapter 6, Part 1, Solid and Hazardous Waste Act;
(b)  the waste tire is shredded; and
(c)  the waste tire is stored in a segregated cell or other landfill facility
that ensures that the disposed shredded waste tire is in a clean and
accessible condition so that the waste tire may be reasonably retrieved and
recycled at a future time.
(2)  The owner or operator of a landfill may apply to the local health
department having jurisdiction over the applicant's business address for
reimbursement of $20 per ton of waste tires placed in the landfill if:
(a)  the waste tires are disposed in compliance with Subsection (1);
(b)  the waste tires are generated from within the state; and
(c)  the application includes:
(i)  the site from which the waste tires are removed;
(ii)  the landfill where the waste tires are disposed; and
(iii)  the amount of shredded tires disposed.
(3)  An application for reimbursement under this section is substantially the
same as the application process required of recyclers applying for partial
reimbursement under Section 19-6-813.
(4)  A waste tire, for which reimbursement is paid under this section, is not
eligible for additional reimbursement under this part.
